North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131D. Inspection and Licensing of Facilities.
Article 1A. Control over Child Placing and Child Care.

Part 1. In General.

§ 131D-10.1.
Foster Care Children’s Bill of Rights; purpose.

It is the policy of this State to strengthen and preserve the family as a unit consistent with a high priority of protecting children’s welfare. When a child requires care outside the family unit, it is the duty of the State to assure that the quality of substitute care is as close as possible to the care and nurturing that society expects of a family. However, the State recognizes there are instances when protecting a child’s welfare outweighs reunifying the family unit, and as such, the care of residential care facilities providing high quality services that include meeting the children’s educational needs as determined by the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services can satisfy the standard of protecting a child’s welfare, regardless of the child’s age, particularly when the sibling groups can be kept intact. To that end, the General Assembly promotes the following in the provision of foster care:

A safe foster home free of violence, abuse, neglect, and danger.

First priority regarding placement in a home with siblings.

The ability to communicate with the assigned social worker or case worker overseeing the child’s case and have calls made to the social worker or case worker returned within a reasonable period of time.

Allowing the child to remain enrolled in the school the child attended before being placed in foster care, if at all possible.

Having a social worker, when a child is removed from the home, to immediately begin conducting an investigation to identify and locate all grandparents, adult siblings, and other adult relatives of the child to provide those persons with specific information and explanation of various options to participate in placement of a child.

Participation in school extracurricular activities, community events, and religious practices.

Communication with the biological parents if the child placed in foster care receives any immunizations and whether any additional immunizations are needed if the child will be transitioning back into a home with his or her biological parents.

Establishing and having access to a bank or savings account in accordance with State laws and federal regulations.

Obtaining identification and permanent documents, including a birth certificate, social security card, and health records by the age of 16, to the extent allowed by federal and State law.

The use of appropriate communication measures to maintain contact with siblings if the child placed in foster care is separated from his or her siblings.

Meaningful participation in a transition plan for those phasing out of foster care, including participation in family team, treatment team, court, and school meetings.

A violation of subdivisions (1) through (11) of this subsection shall not be construed to create a cause of action under this section against the State, the Department of Health and Human Services, or a person or entity providing foster care pursuant to this Article.

The purpose of this Article is to assign the authority to protect the health, safety and well-being of children separated from or being cared for away from their families.

History.

1983, c. 637, s. 2; 2009-408, s. 1; 2013-326, s. 1.

Drivers License Pilot Project.

Session Laws
2017-41, s. 6.1(a), (b), provides: “(a) The General Assembly recognizes that not having a drivers license is a barrier to education, employment, health care, and other community-based activities for older youth in foster care, as defined in
G.S. 131D-10.2(9), working toward independence. One of the biggest barriers to accessing a drivers license for such youth is the ability to obtain insurance. Therefore, to assist in this effort, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, shall establish a two-year pilot program that shall reimburse, on a first-come, first-served basis, youth and caregivers’ costs associated with drivers license education, drivers license fees, insurance costs, and any other costs associated with obtaining a drivers license. The Division shall take appropriate steps to ensure proper advertising of the pilot program.

“(b) The Division of Social Services shall report on the pilot project to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services by March 1, 2018.”

Session Laws
2017-41, s. 7(a)-(c), provides: “(a) The General Assembly has determined that in an effort to maximize funding, local management entities/managed care organizations (LME/MCOs) are utilizing Intensive Alternative Family Treatment (IAFT), which is a means of cost-effective, specialized foster care treatment service that is being used for many youth who would have previously been treated in Medicaid congregate care, such as psychiatric residential treatment facilities. The General Assembly finds that these higher-need youth are often (i) suspended or expelled from school or day programs and (ii) require multiple appointments on a weekly basis to address needs, such as therapy, medication management, and school individual education plans (IEPs). Further, in accordance with rules, foster parents are required to maintain outside employment while providing foster care, but the constant demands of meeting the needs of these foster youth often lead to disruption in placement as the foster parent is unable to meet those needs while maintaining the parent’s employment obligations.

“(b) To that end, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services (Division), shall establish a pilot program that will allow the Division to waive the employment requirement for foster parents with children utilizing the Intensive Alternative Family Treatment (IAFT). The Division shall solicit participation in the pilot program from interested local management entities/managed care organizations (LME/MCOs). The participating LME/MCOs shall conduct comparison measures between existing IAFT outcomes and those of pilots to determine any impact the waiver may have on outside employment. LME/MCOs shall measure progress of the pilot waivers based on the expectation of meeting the following outcomes:

“(1) Improved placement stability with less than twenty percent (20%) of moves of youth occurring due to therapeutic foster parent request.

“(2) Seventy-five percent (75%) of youth and families meeting their treatment goals within the projected time frame.

“(3) No more than a ten percent (10%) increase in higher-level hospital bed days.

“(c) LME/MCOs participating in the IAFT pilot waiver program shall provide a report on the outcomes of the pilots, along with any recommendations, to the Division. The Division shall then submit a report on the pilot waiver program to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services by December 1, 2018.”

Child Welfare/Behavioral Health Pilot Project.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 9I.12(a)-(c), provides: “(a) From funds appropriated in this act to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, for the 2021-2022 fiscal year, the Division of Social Services, in collaboration with the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, shall establish a two-year child welfare and behavioral health pilot project that will provide easier access to comprehensive health services for children in foster care by (i) creating better continuity of care, (ii) providing an alternative to therapeutic foster care, and (iii) ensuring care and services are available without disruption to a child’s foster care placement while accessing services needed to treat the child's trauma. Four counties shall participate in the pilot project, which shall include Davie, Forsyth, Rockingham, and Stokes.

“(b) The purpose of the pilot project is to establish a trauma-informed integrated health foster care model to facilitate partnerships between county departments of social services and local management entities/managed care organizations (LME/MCOs) regarding children placed in foster care that will do each of the following:

“(1) Address safety and health needs of children with the application of trauma-informed tools.

“(2) Address appropriate preventive and medical care for children placed in foster care.

“(3) Address other social determinants of health, specifically those related to education and social development.

“(4) Meet the goals of Medicaid Transformation, Child Welfare Reform, and the federal Families First Prevention Services Act (Family First Act).

“(5) Provide for collaboration across agencies, including private behavioral health providers, health systems, and agencies of social determinants of health.

“(6) Allow for the development of alternative funding models and service definitions.

“(7) Allow for behavioral health services in family foster homes augmented with mental health services.

“(8) Allow for wraparound services for the child to support a singular, unified goal of children in foster care having a single placement.

“(9) Assign dedicated care coordination to each county social services agency.

“(c) The Division of Social Services and the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services shall submit a progress report on the pilot project established under this section to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services (Committee) by April 1, 2022, and submit a final report to the Committee by October 1, 2023, that, at a minimum, includes each of the following:

“(1) The average cost of providing alternatives to therapeutic foster care.

“(2) An outline of enhanced services offered and developed during the pilot project, including barriers and challenges.

“(3) The outcomes achieved from the pilot project.

“(4) A plan outlining the potential for replication across other counties, including cost-modeling recommendations.”

§ 131D-10.2.
Definitions.

For purposes of this Article, unless the context clearly implies otherwise:

“Adoption” means the act of creating a legal relationship between parent and child where it did not exist genetically.

“Adoptive Home” means a family home approved by a child placing agency to accept a child for adoption.

“Child” means an individual less than 21 years of age, who has not been emancipated under the provisions of Article 35 of Chapter 7B of the General Statutes.

“Child Placing Agency” means a person authorized by statute or license under this Article to receive children for purposes of placement in residential group care, family foster homes or adoptive homes.

“Children’s Camp” means a residential child-care facility which provides foster care at either a permanent camp site or in a wilderness setting.

(6a)

“Criminal History” means a county, State, or federal conviction of a felony by a court of competent jurisdiction or a pending felony indictment of a crime for child abuse or neglect, spousal abuse, a crime against a child, including child pornography, or for a crime involving violence, including rape, sexual assault, or homicide, other than physical assault or battery; a county, State, or federal conviction of a felony by a court of competent jurisdiction or a pending felony indictment for physical assault, battery, or a drug-related offense, if the offense was committed within the past five years; or similar crimes under federal law or under the laws of other states.

(7)

“Department” means the Department of Health and Human Services.

(8)

“Family Foster Home” means the private residence of one or more individuals who permanently reside as members of the household and who provide continuing full-time foster care for a child or children who are placed there by a child placing agency or who provide continuing full-time foster care for two or more children who are unrelated to the adult members of the household by blood, marriage, guardianship or adoption.

(9)

“Foster Care” means the continuing provision of the essentials of daily living on a 24-hour basis for dependent, neglected, abused, abandoned, destitute, orphaned, undisciplined or delinquent children or other children who, due to similar problems of behavior or family conditions, are living apart from their parents, relatives, or guardians in a family foster home or residential child-care facility. The essentials of daily living include but are not limited to shelter, meals, clothing, education, recreation, and individual attention and supervision.

(9a)

“Foster Parent” means any individual who is 21 years of age or older who is licensed by the State to provide foster care.

(10)

“Person” means an individual, partnership, joint-stock company, trust, voluntary association, corporation, agency, or other organization or enterprise doing business in this State, whether or not for profit.

(11)

“Primarily Educational Institution” means any institution which operates one or more scholastic or vocational and technical education programs that can be offered in satisfaction of compulsory school attendance laws, in which the primary purpose of the housing and care of children is to meet their educational needs, provided such institution has complied with Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.

(12)

“Provisional License” means a type of license granted by the Department to a person who is temporarily unable to comply with a rule or rules adopted under this Article.

(13)

“Residential Child-Care Facility” means a staffed premise with paid or volunteer staff where children receive continuing full-time foster care. Residential child-care facility includes child-caring institutions, group homes, and children’s camps which provide foster care.

(14)

“Therapeutic Foster Home” means a family foster home where, in addition to the provision of foster care, foster parents who receive appropriate training provide a child with behavioral health treatment services under the supervision of a county department of social services, an area mental health program, or a licensed private agency and in compliance with licensing rules adopted by the Commission.

History.

1983, c. 637, s. 2; 1993, c. 180, s. 5; 1995, c. 507, s. 23.26(a); 1997-140, s. 1; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 13(hh); 2001-487, s. 84(b); 2007-276, s. 11; 2015-241, s. 12C.9(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-276, s. 11 , effective October 1, 2007, rewrote subdivision (6a).

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 12C.9(d), effective January 1, 2017, substituted “21 years of age” for “18 years of age” in subdivisions (3) and (9a).

§ 131D-10.2A.
Reasonable and prudent parent standard.

The reasonable and prudent parent standard is the standard characterized by careful and sensible parental decisions that are reasonably intended to maintain the health, safety, and best interests of the child while at the same time encouraging the emotional and developmental growth of the child that a caregiver shall use when determining whether to allow a child in foster care under the responsibility of the State to participate in extracurricular, enrichment, cultural, and social activities.

Every child care institution shall designate an on-site official who is authorized to apply the reasonable and prudent parent standard pursuant to this section.

A caregiver, including the child’s foster parent, whether the child is in a family foster home or a therapeutic foster home, or the designated official at a child care institution where the child is placed, or the county department of social services, must use the reasonable and prudent parent standard when determining whether to allow a child in foster care to participate in extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities.

A caregiver, including the child’s foster parent, whether the child is in a family foster home or a therapeutic foster home, may be held liable for an act or omission of the child if the caregiver fails to act in accordance with the reasonable and prudent parent standard under this section. To the extent it may be applicable, the liability of a county department of social services, or the Department of Health and Human Services, shall be strictly adjudicated according to and in compliance with the terms of

G.S. 153A-435

, et seq., or

G.S. 143-291

, et seq., as applicable. Nothing in this subsection is intended to abrogate or diminish the qualified immunities of public officials acting in the course and scope of their employment.

Unless otherwise ordered by a court with jurisdiction pursuant to

G.S. 7B-200

, a caregiver, including the child’s foster parent, whether the child is in a family foster home or a therapeutic foster home, exercising the reasonable and prudent parent standard has the authority to provide or withhold permission, without prior approval of the court or a county department of social services, to allow a child in foster care, in the custody of a county department of social services, or under the placement authority of a county department of social services through a voluntary placement agreement to participate in normal childhood activities. Normal childhood activities shall include, but are not limited to, extracurricular, enrichment, and social activities and may include overnight activities outside the direct supervision of the caregiver for periods of over 24 hours and up to 72 hours.

The caregiver, including the child’s foster parent, whether the child is in a family foster home or a therapeutic foster home, or the designated official at a child care institution where the child is placed, shall not be liable for injuries to the child that occur as a result of acting in accordance with the reasonable and prudent parent standard.

The immunity provided in subsection (f) of this section does not apply if it is determined that the injuries to the child were caused by gross negligence, willful and wanton conduct, or intentional wrongdoing, or arose out of the operation of a motor vehicle. Any liability under this subsection that may be attributable to either the county department of social services or the Department of Health and Human Services shall be strictly adjudicated according to and in compliance with the terms of

G.S. 153A-435

, et seq., or

G.S. 143-291

, et seq., as applicable. Nothing in this subsection is intended to abrogate or diminish the qualified immunities of public officials acting in the course and scope of their employment.

For any action under this section, the burden of proof with respect to a breach of the reasonable and prudent parent standard shall be by clear and convincing evidence.

History.

2015-135, s. 2.1.

§ 131D-10.2B.
Foster care until 21 years of age.

A child placed in foster care who has attained the age of 18 years may continue receiving foster care services until reaching 21 years of age as provided by law. A child who initially chooses to opt out of foster care upon attaining the age of 18 years may opt to receive foster care services at a later date until reaching 21 years of age.

A child who has attained the age of 18 years and chosen to continue receiving foster care services until reaching 21 years of age may continue to receive benefits pursuant to Part 4 of Article 2 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes upon meeting the requirements under

G.S. 108A-48(c)

.

History.

2015-241, s. 12C.9(e).

§ 131D-10.3.
Licensure required.

No person shall operate, establish or provide foster care for children or receive and place children in residential care facilities, family foster homes, or adoptive homes without first applying for a license to the Department and submitting the required information on application forms provided by the Department.

Persons licensed or seeking a license under this Article shall permit the Department access to premises and information required to determine whether the person is in compliance with licensing rules of the Commission.

Persons licensed pursuant to this Article shall be periodically reviewed by the Department to determine whether they comply with Commission rules and whether licensure shall continue.

This Article shall apply to all persons intending to organize, develop or provide foster care for children or receive and place children in residential child-care facilities, family foster homes or adoptive homes irrespective of such persons having applied for or obtained a certification, registration or permit to carry on work not controlled by this Article except persons exempted in

G.S. 131D-10.4

.

(d1)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Department shall grant or deny a license to provide foster care or therapeutic foster care within three months from the date of application.

Unless revoked or modified to a provisional or suspended status, the terms of a license issued by the Department shall be in force for a period not to exceed 24 months from the date of issuance under rules adopted by the Commission.

Persons licensed or seeking a license who are temporarily unable to comply with a rule or rules may be granted a provisional license. The provisional license can be issued for a period not to exceed six months. The noncompliance with a rule or rules shall not present an immediate threat to the health and safety of the children, and the person shall have a plan approved by the Department to correct the area(s) of noncompliance within the provisional period. A provisional license for an additional period of time to meet the same area(s) of noncompliance shall not be issued.

In accordance with Commission rules, a person may submit to the Department documentation of compliance with the standards of a nationally recognized accrediting body, and the Department on the basis of such accreditation may deem the person in compliance with one or more Commission licensing rules.

Except as provided in subsection (i) of this section, the Secretary shall not enroll any new provider for Medicaid Home or Community Based services or other Medicaid services, as defined in 42 C.F.R. 440.90, 42 C.F.R. 440.130(d), and 42 C.F.R. 440.180, or issue a license for a new facility or a new service to any applicant meeting any of the following criteria:

The applicant was the owner, principal, or affiliate of a licensable facility under Chapter 122C, Chapter 131D, or Article 7 of Chapter 110 that had its license revoked until 60 months after the date of the revocation.

The applicant is the owner, principal, or affiliate of a licensable facility that was assessed a penalty for a Type A or Type B violation under Article 3 of Chapter 122C, or any combination thereof, and any one of the following conditions exist:

A single violation has been assessed in the six months prior to the application.

Two violations have been assessed in the 18 months prior to the application and 18 months have not passed from the date of the most recent violation.

Three violations have been assessed in the 36 months prior to the application and 36 months have not passed from the date of the most recent violation.

Four or more violations have been assessed in the 60 months prior to application and 60 months have not passed from the date of the most recent violation.

The applicant is the owner, principal, or affiliate of a licensable facility that had its license summarily suspended or downgraded to provisional status as a result of violations under G.S. 122C-24.1(a) until 60 months after the date of reinstatement or restoration of the license.

The applicant is the owner, principal, or affiliate of a licensable facility that had its license summarily suspended or downgraded to provisional status as a result of violations under Article 1A of Chapter 131D, or had its license summarily suspended or denied under Article 7 of Chapter 110 until 60 months after the date of reinstatement or restoration of the license.

The Secretary may enroll a provider described in subsection (h) of this section if any of the following circumstances apply:

The applicant is an area program or county program providing services under

G.S. 122C-141

, and there is no other provider of the service in the catchment area.

The Secretary finds that the area program or county program has shown good cause by clear and convincing evidence why the enrollment should be allowed.

For purposes of subdivision (h)(2) of this section, fines assessed prior to October 23, 2002, are not applicable to this provision. However, licensure or enrollment shall be denied if an applicant’s history as a provider under Chapter 131D, Chapter 122C, or Article 7 of Chapter 110 is such that the Secretary has concluded the applicant will likely be unable to comply with licensing or enrollment statutes, rules, or regulations. In the event the Secretary denies licensure or enrollment under this subsection, the reasons for the denial and appeal rights pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 150B shall be given to the provider in writing.

History.

1983, c. 637, s. 2; 2002-164, s. 4.4; 2003-294, s. 4; 2017-41, s. 9.1.

Comprehensive Treatment Services Program.

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 10.10(a)-(h), (j), (k), provides: “(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall continue the Comprehensive Treatment Services Program for children at risk for institutionalization or other out-of-home placement. The Program shall be implemented by the Department in consultation with the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention [now the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety], the Department of Public Instruction, and other affected State agencies. The purpose of the Program is to provide appropriate and medically necessary nonresidential and residential treatment alternatives for children at risk of institutionalization or other out-of-home placement. Program funds shall be targeted for non-Medicaid eligible children. Program funds may also be used to expand a system-of-care approach for services to children and their families statewide. The program shall include the following:

“(1) Behavioral health screening for all children at risk of institutionalization or other out-of-home placement.

“(2) Appropriate and medically necessary nonresidential and residential services for children within the child mental health deaf and hard of hearing target population.

“(3) Appropriate and medically necessary nonresidential and residential treatment services, including placements for sexually aggressive youth.

“(4) Appropriate and medically necessary nonresidential and residential treatment services, including placements for youth needing substance abuse treatment services and children with serious emotional disturbances.

“(5) Multidisciplinary case management services, as needed.

“(6) A system of utilization review specific to the nature and design of the Program.

“(7) Mechanisms to ensure that children are not placed in department of social services custody for the purpose of obtaining mental health residential treatment services.

“(8) Mechanisms to maximize current State and local funds and to expand use of Medicaid funds to accomplish the intent of this Program.

“(9) Other appropriate components to accomplish the Program’s purpose.

“(10) The Secretary of the Department of Health and Human Services may enter into contracts with residential service providers.

“(11) A system of identifying and tracking children placed outside of the family unit in group homes, therapeutic foster care home settings, and other out-of-home placements.

“(12) The development of a strong infrastructure of interagency collaboration.

“(13) Individualized strengths-based care.

“(b) In order to ensure that children at risk for institutionalization or other out-of-home placement are appropriately served by the mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services system, the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, shall do the following with respect to services provided to these children:

“(1) Provide only those treatment services that are medically necessary.

“(2) Implement utilization review of services provided.

“(3) Adopt the following guiding principles for the provision of services:

“a. Service delivery system must be outcome-oriented and evaluation-based.

“b. Services should be delivered as close as possible to the child’s home.

“c. Services selected should be those that are most efficient in terms of cost and effectiveness.

“d. Services should not be provided solely for the convenience of the provider or the client.

“e. Families and consumers should be involved in decision making throughout treatment planning and delivery.

“f. Services shall be specified, delivered, and monitored through a unified Child and Family Plan incorporating the principles of one-child-one-team-one-plan.

“g. Out-of-home placements for children shall be a last resort and shall include concrete plans to bring the children back to a stable, permanent home, their schools, and their community.

“(4) Implement all of the following cost-reduction strategies:

“a. Preauthorization for all services except emergency services.

“b. Levels of care to assist in the development of treatment plans.

“c. Clinically appropriate services.

“(c) The Department shall collaborate with other affected State agencies such as the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, the Department of Public Instruction, the Administrative Office of the Courts, and with local departments of social services, area mental health programs, and local education agencies to eliminate cost shifting and facilitate cost-sharing among these governmental agencies with respect to the treatment and placement services.

“(d) The Department shall not allocate funds appropriated for Program services until a Memorandum of Agreement has been executed between the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Public Instruction, and other affected State agencies. The Memorandum of Agreement shall address specifically the roles and responsibilities of the various departmental divisions and affected State agencies involved in the administration, financing, care, and placement of children at risk of institutionalization or other out-of-home placement. The Department shall not allocate funds appropriated in this act for the Program until the Memoranda of Agreement between local departments of social services, area mental health programs, local education agencies, the Administrative Office of the Courts, and the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, as appropriate, are executed to effectuate the purpose of the Program. The Memoranda of Agreement shall address issues pertinent to local implementation of the Program, including provision for the immediate availability of student records to a local school administrative unit receiving a child placed in a residential setting outside the child’s home county.

“(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, services under the Comprehensive Treatment Services Program are not an entitlement for non-Medicaid eligible children served by the Program.

“(f) Of the funds appropriated in this act for the Comprehensive Treatment Services Program, the Department of Health and Human Services shall establish a reserve of three percent (3%) to ensure availability of these funds to address specialized needs for children with unique or highly complex problems.

“(g) The Department of Health and Human Services, in conjunction with the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, the Department of Public Instruction, and other affected agencies, shall report on the following Program information:

“(1) The number and other demographic information of children served.

“(2) The amount and source of funds expended to implement the Program.

“(3) Information regarding the number of children screened, specific placement of children, including the placement of children in programs or facilities outside of the child’s home county, and treatment needs of children served.

“(4) The average length of stay in residential treatment, transition, and return to home.

“(5) The number of children diverted from institutions or other out-of-home placements such as training schools and State psychiatric hospitals and a description of the services provided.

“(6) Recommendations on other areas of the Program that need to be improved.

“(7) Other information relevant to successful implementation of the Program.

“(h) The Department shall report on the following Program funding information:

“(1) The amount of Program funding allocated and expended by each LME.

“(2) The amount of Program funds each LME transferred out of the Program to serve purposes other than those outlined by this Program and an explanation of why LMEs transferred the funding.

“(3) Recommendations to improve the penetration rate of Program funds to serve the intended populations across the State.

“(j) Upon approval of the Legislative Services Commission, the Legislative Services Officer shall assign professional and clerical staff to assist in the work of the Task Force. Professional staff shall be those assigned to subject areas or agencies involving child-serving programs administered by the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department of Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention, the Administrative Office of the Courts, and the Department of Public Instruction. Clerical staff shall be furnished to the Task Force through the offices of the House of Representatives and Senate Directors of Legislative Assistants.

“(k) The Department shall report on April 1, 2008, and April 1, 2009, on the implementation of subsections (a) through (h) of this section. The reports required under this subsection shall be made to the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, and the Fiscal Research Division.”

For similar provisions, see Session Laws 2003-294, s. 6(a), and 2005-276, s. 10.25(a)-(g) and (m).

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 1.2, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations and Capital Improvements Appropriations Act of 2007’.”

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 32.3, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2007-2009 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 32.5, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2017-41, s. 9.2, provides: “The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Social Services, shall further examine the existing time frames for processing foster care and therapeutic foster care applications and determine methods to further reduce the time frames for approving or denying applications for licensure.”

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-41, s. 9.1, effective June 21, 2017, added subsection (d1).